Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-502
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(1) Archaeological sites represent an important public resource embodying the record of our state's cultural heritage;

(2) The resource base of archaeological sites is being threatened at an increasing rate by agricultural, urban, commercial, transportation, governmental, and industrial development; and

(3) The rights of private property owners must be maintained even when their property contains archaeological sites or resources.

Laws 2005, LB 211, § 2.